Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1979
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Title Insurers Act is to provide for the effective regulation and supervision of title insurance and title insurers authorized to issue title insurance policies or otherwise transact the business of title insurance in this state.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 2.